North Carolina, session 2025, HB939.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 7B of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new Part to read:
"Part 7. School Personnel.
"§ 115C-77.80. School chaplains.
(a) The governing body of a public school unit may employ, contract for, or accept as a
volunteer a qualified chaplain to serve as a school chaplain. To have a school chaplain serve in a
public school unit, the governing body of the public school unit shall adopt a school chaplain
policy that includes at least the following:
(1) Requires chaplains to have certified training through the National School
Chaplain Association, Federation of Fire Chaplains, or Association of Law
Enforcement Chaplains.
(2) A detailed description of the support, services, and programs the school
chaplain will provide.
(3) Continuing education requirements for school chaplains.
(4) Provisions for the discipline and termination of a school chaplain, if necessary.
(b) Notwithstanding G.S. 115C-332(b), 115C-218.90(b), 115C-238.73(b),
116-239.12(b), and any other provision of law to the contrary, before a school chaplain begins
serving in a public school unit, the governing body of the public school unit shall conduct a
criminal history check of the chaplain in accordance with G.S. 115C-332. A copy of the criminal
history check shall be sent to the Superintendent of Public Instruction for review. If the
Superintendent finds that the chaplain has been convicted of any crime defined in
G.S. 115C-332(a)(1), the Superintendent shall direct the public school unit to revoke the offer of
employment to the chaplain or reject the chaplain as a volunteer.
(c) School chaplains shall not be liable in civil damages to any party for any loss or
damage caused by any act or omission relating to the performance of school chaplain duties,
unless that act or omission amounts to gross negligence, wanton conduct, or intentional
wrongdoing.
(d) Nothing in this section requires a public school unit to hire or accept a volunteer
school chaplain. The employment of a school chaplain pursuant to this section shall not be
construed as an endorsement of any particular religion."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
*H939-v-1*